Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3818
Corporation; prohibited memberships; laws not applicable.

A prepaid dental service corporation shall not be a member of the Nebraska Property and Liability Insurance Guaranty Association described in Chapter 44, article 24, or the Nebraska Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Association described in Chapter 44, article 27. The Nebraska Property and Liability Insurance Guaranty Association Act and the Nebraska Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Association Act shall not be applicable to prepaid dental service plans.

Laws 1982, LB 139, § 18.

Nebraska Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Association Act, see section 44-2720.

Nebraska Property and Liability Insurance Guaranty Association Act, see section 44-2418.